Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.080

Branches and subagencies.

Every dealer maintaining a branch or subagency in another city or town in this state shall be required to have a separate aircraft dealer's license for such branch or subagency, in the same manner as though each constituted a separate and distinct dealer.

[ 1955 c 150 s 8.]